Illinois, session 104th, HB1721.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Children and Family Services Act is amended 5by changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 505/5)7    Sec. 5. Direct child welfare services; Department of 8Children and Family Services. To provide direct child welfare 9services when not available through other public or private 10child care or program facilities.11    (a) For purposes of this Section:12        (1) "Children" means persons found within the State 13    who are under the age of 18 years. The term also includes 14    persons under age 21 who:15            (A) were committed to the Department pursuant to 16        the Juvenile Court Act or the Juvenile Court Act of 17        1987 and who continue under the jurisdiction of the 18        court; or19            (B) were accepted for care, service and training 20        by the Department prior to the age of 18 and whose best 21        interest in the discretion of the Department would be 22        served by continuing that care, service and training 23        because of severe emotional disturbances, physical   HB1721- 2 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1        disability, social adjustment or any combination 2        thereof, or because of the need to complete an 3        educational or vocational training program.4        (2) "Homeless youth" means persons found within the 5    State who are under the age of 19, are not in a safe and 6    stable living situation and cannot be reunited with their 7    families.8        (3) "Child welfare services" means public social 9    services which are directed toward the accomplishment of 10    the following purposes:11            (A) protecting and promoting the health, safety 12        and welfare of children, including homeless, 13        dependent, or neglected children;14            (B) remedying, or assisting in the solution of 15        problems which may result in, the neglect, abuse, 16        exploitation, or delinquency of children;17            (C) preventing the unnecessary separation of 18        children from their families by identifying family 19        problems, assisting families in resolving their 20        problems, and preventing the breakup of the family 21        where the prevention of child removal is desirable and 22        possible when the child can be cared for at home 23        without endangering the child's health and safety;24            (D) restoring to their families children who have 25        been removed, by the provision of services to the 26        child and the families when the child can be cared for   HB1721- 3 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1        at home without endangering the child's health and 2        safety;3            (E) placing children in suitable permanent family 4        arrangements, through guardianship or adoption, in 5        cases where restoration to the birth family is not 6        safe, possible, or appropriate;7            (F) at the time of placement, conducting 8        concurrent planning, as described in subsection (l-1) 9        of this Section, so that permanency may occur at the 10        earliest opportunity. Consideration should be given so 11        that if reunification fails or is delayed, the 12        placement made is the best available placement to 13        provide permanency for the child;14            (G) (blank);15            (H) (blank); and16            (I) placing and maintaining children in facilities 17        that provide separate living quarters for children 18        under the age of 18 and for children 18 years of age 19        and older, unless a child 18 years of age is in the 20        last year of high school education or vocational 21        training, in an approved individual or group treatment 22        program, in a licensed shelter facility, or secure 23        child care facility. The Department is not required to 24        place or maintain children:25                (i) who are in a foster home, or26                (ii) who are persons with a developmental   HB1721- 4 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1            disability, as defined in the Mental Health and 2            Developmental Disabilities Code, or3                (iii) who are female children who are 4            pregnant, pregnant and parenting, or parenting, or5                (iv) who are siblings, in facilities that 6            provide separate living quarters for children 18 7            years of age and older and for children under 18 8            years of age.9    (b) (Blank).10    (b-5) The Department shall adopt rules to establish a 11process for all licensed residential providers in Illinois to 12submit data as required by the Department if they contract or 13receive reimbursement for children's mental health, substance 14use, and developmental disability services from the Department 15of Human Services, the Department of Juvenile Justice, or the 16Department of Healthcare and Family Services. The requested 17data must include, but is not limited to, capacity, staffing, 18and occupancy data for the purpose of establishing State need 19and placement availability. 20    All information collected, shared, or stored pursuant to 21this subsection shall be handled in accordance with all State 22and federal privacy laws and accompanying regulations and 23rules, including without limitation the federal Health 24Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public 25Law 104-191) and the Mental Health and Developmental 26Disabilities Confidentiality Act.   HB1721- 5 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1    (c) The Department shall establish and maintain 2tax-supported child welfare services and extend and seek to 3improve voluntary services throughout the State, to the end 4that services and care shall be available on an equal basis 5throughout the State to children requiring such services.6    (d) The Director may authorize advance disbursements for 7any new program initiative to any agency contracting with the 8Department. As a prerequisite for an advance disbursement, the 9contractor must post a surety bond in the amount of the advance 10disbursement and have a purchase of service contract approved 11by the Department. The Department may pay up to 2 months 12operational expenses in advance. The amount of the advance 13disbursement shall be prorated over the life of the contract 14or the remaining months of the fiscal year, whichever is less, 15and the installment amount shall then be deducted from future 16bills. Advance disbursement authorizations for new initiatives 17shall not be made to any agency after that agency has operated 18during 2 consecutive fiscal years. The requirements of this 19Section concerning advance disbursements shall not apply with 20respect to the following: payments to local public agencies 21for child day care services as authorized by Section 5a of this 22Act; and youth service programs receiving grant funds under 23Section 17a-4.24    (e) (Blank).25    (f) (Blank).26    (g) The Department shall establish rules and regulations   HB1721- 6 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1concerning its operation of programs designed to meet the 2goals of child safety and protection, family preservation, 3family reunification, and adoption, including, but not limited 4to:5        (1) adoption;6        (2) foster care;7        (3) family counseling;8        (4) protective services;9        (5) (blank);10        (6) homemaker service;11        (7) return of runaway children;12        (8) (blank);13        (9) placement under Section 5-7 of the Juvenile Court 14    Act or Section 2-27, 3-28, 4-25, or 5-740 of the Juvenile 15    Court Act of 1987 in accordance with the federal Adoption 16    Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980; and 17        (10) interstate services.18    Rules and regulations established by the Department shall 19include provisions for training Department staff and the staff 20of Department grantees, through contracts with other agencies 21or resources, in screening techniques to identify substance 22use disorders, as defined in the Substance Use Disorder Act, 23approved by the Department of Human Services, as a successor 24to the Department of Alcoholism and Substance Abuse, for the 25purpose of identifying children and adults who should be 26referred for an assessment at an organization appropriately   HB1721- 7 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1licensed by the Department of Human Services for substance use 2disorder treatment.3    (h) If the Department finds that there is no appropriate 4program or facility within or available to the Department for 5a youth in care and that no licensed private facility has an 6adequate and appropriate program or none agrees to accept the 7youth in care, the Department shall create an appropriate 8individualized, program-oriented plan for such youth in care. 9The plan may be developed within the Department or through 10purchase of services by the Department to the extent that it is 11within its statutory authority to do.12    (i) Service programs shall be available throughout the 13State and shall include but not be limited to the following 14services:15        (1) case management;16        (2) homemakers;17        (3) counseling;18        (4) parent education;19        (5) day care; and20        (6) emergency assistance and advocacy.21    In addition, the following services may be made available 22to assess and meet the needs of children and families:23        (1) comprehensive family-based services;24        (2) assessments;25        (3) respite care; and26        (4) in-home health services.  HB1721- 8 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1    The Department shall provide transportation for any of the 2services it makes available to children or families or for 3which it refers children or families.4    (j) The Department may provide categories of financial 5assistance and education assistance grants, and shall 6establish rules and regulations concerning the assistance and 7grants, to persons who adopt children with physical or mental 8disabilities, children who are older, or other hard-to-place 9children who (i) immediately prior to their adoption were 10youth in care or (ii) were determined eligible for financial 11assistance with respect to a prior adoption and who become 12available for adoption because the prior adoption has been 13dissolved and the parental rights of the adoptive parents have 14been terminated or because the child's adoptive parents have 15died. The Department may continue to provide financial 16assistance and education assistance grants for a child who was 17determined eligible for financial assistance under this 18subsection (j) in the interim period beginning when the 19child's adoptive parents died and ending with the finalization 20of the new adoption of the child by another adoptive parent or 21parents. The Department may also provide categories of 22financial assistance and education assistance grants, and 23shall establish rules and regulations for the assistance and 24grants, to persons appointed guardian of the person under 25Section 5-7 of the Juvenile Court Act or Section 2-27, 3-28, 264-25, or 5-740 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for children   HB1721- 9 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1who were youth in care for 12 months immediately prior to the 2appointment of the guardian.3    The amount of assistance may vary, depending upon the 4needs of the child and the adoptive parents, as set forth in 5the annual assistance agreement. Special purpose grants are 6allowed where the child requires special service but such 7costs may not exceed the amounts which similar services would 8cost the Department if it were to provide or secure them as 9guardian of the child.10    Any financial assistance provided under this subsection is 11inalienable by assignment, sale, execution, attachment, 12garnishment, or any other remedy for recovery or collection of 13a judgment or debt.14    (j-5) The Department shall not deny or delay the placement 15of a child for adoption if an approved family is available 16either outside of the Department region handling the case, or 17outside of the State of Illinois.18    (k) The Department shall accept for care and training any 19child who has been adjudicated neglected or abused, or 20dependent committed to it pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act 21or the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.22    (l) The Department shall offer family preservation 23services, as defined in Section 8.2 of the Abused and 24Neglected Child Reporting Act, to help families, including 25adoptive and extended families. Family preservation services 26shall be offered (i) to prevent the placement of children in   HB1721- 10 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1substitute care when the children can be cared for at home or 2in the custody of the person responsible for the children's 3welfare, (ii) to reunite children with their families, or 4(iii) to maintain an adoptive placement. Family preservation 5services shall only be offered when doing so will not endanger 6the children's health or safety. With respect to children who 7are in substitute care pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act of 81987, family preservation services shall not be offered if a 9goal other than those of subdivisions (A), (B), or (B-1) of 10subsection (2) of Section 2-28 of that Act has been set, except 11that reunification services may be offered as provided in 12paragraph (F) of subsection (2) of Section 2-28 of that Act. 13Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to create a 14private right of action or claim on the part of any individual 15or child welfare agency, except that when a child is the 16subject of an action under Article II of the Juvenile Court Act 17of 1987 and the child's service plan calls for services to 18facilitate achievement of the permanency goal, the court 19hearing the action under Article II of the Juvenile Court Act 20of 1987 may order the Department to provide the services set 21out in the plan, if those services are not provided with 22reasonable promptness and if those services are available.23    The Department shall notify the child and the child's 24family of the Department's responsibility to offer and provide 25family preservation services as identified in the service 26plan. The child and the child's family shall be eligible for   HB1721- 11 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1services as soon as the report is determined to be 2"indicated". The Department may offer services to any child or 3family with respect to whom a report of suspected child abuse 4or neglect has been filed, prior to concluding its 5investigation under Section 7.12 of the Abused and Neglected 6Child Reporting Act. However, the child's or family's 7willingness to accept services shall not be considered in the 8investigation. The Department may also provide services to any 9child or family who is the subject of any report of suspected 10child abuse or neglect or may refer such child or family to 11services available from other agencies in the community, even 12if the report is determined to be unfounded, if the conditions 13in the child's or family's home are reasonably likely to 14subject the child or family to future reports of suspected 15child abuse or neglect. Acceptance of such services shall be 16voluntary. The Department may also provide services to any 17child or family after completion of a family assessment, as an 18alternative to an investigation, as provided under the 19"differential response program" provided for in subsection 20(a-5) of Section 7.4 of the Abused and Neglected Child 21Reporting Act.22    The Department may, at its discretion except for those 23children also adjudicated neglected or dependent, accept for 24care and training any child who has been adjudicated addicted, 25as a truant minor in need of supervision or as a minor 26requiring authoritative intervention, under the Juvenile Court   HB1721- 12 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1Act or the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, but no such child shall 2be committed to the Department by any court without the 3approval of the Department. On and after January 1, 2015 (the 4effective date of Public Act 98-803) and before January 1, 52017, a minor charged with a criminal offense under the 6Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 or 7adjudicated delinquent shall not be placed in the custody of 8or committed to the Department by any court, except (i) a minor 9less than 16 years of age committed to the Department under 10Section 5-710 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, (ii) a minor 11for whom an independent basis of abuse, neglect, or dependency 12exists, which must be defined by departmental rule, or (iii) a 13minor for whom the court has granted a supplemental petition 14to reinstate wardship pursuant to subsection (2) of Section 152-33 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. On and after January 1, 162017, a minor charged with a criminal offense under the 17Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 or 18adjudicated delinquent shall not be placed in the custody of 19or committed to the Department by any court, except (i) a minor 20less than 15 years of age committed to the Department under 21Section 5-710 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, (ii) a minor 22for whom an independent basis of abuse, neglect, or dependency 23exists, which must be defined by departmental rule, or (iii) a 24minor for whom the court has granted a supplemental petition 25to reinstate wardship pursuant to subsection (2) of Section 262-33 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. An independent basis   HB1721- 13 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1exists when the allegations or adjudication of abuse, neglect, 2or dependency do not arise from the same facts, incident, or 3circumstances which give rise to a charge or adjudication of 4delinquency. The Department shall assign a caseworker to 5attend any hearing involving a youth in the care and custody of 6the Department who is placed on aftercare release, including 7hearings involving sanctions for violation of aftercare 8release conditions and aftercare release revocation hearings. 9    As soon as is possible after August 7, 2009 (the effective 10date of Public Act 96-134), the Department shall develop and 11implement a special program of family preservation services to 12support intact, foster, and adoptive families who are 13experiencing extreme hardships due to the difficulty and 14stress of caring for a child who has been diagnosed with a 15pervasive developmental disorder if the Department determines 16that those services are necessary to ensure the health and 17safety of the child. The Department may offer services to any 18family whether or not a report has been filed under the Abused 19and Neglected Child Reporting Act. The Department may refer 20the child or family to services available from other agencies 21in the community if the conditions in the child's or family's 22home are reasonably likely to subject the child or family to 23future reports of suspected child abuse or neglect. Acceptance 24of these services shall be voluntary. The Department shall 25develop and implement a public information campaign to alert 26health and social service providers and the general public   HB1721- 14 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1about these special family preservation services. The nature 2and scope of the services offered and the number of families 3served under the special program implemented under this 4paragraph shall be determined by the level of funding that the 5Department annually allocates for this purpose. The term 6"pervasive developmental disorder" under this paragraph means 7a neurological condition, including, but not limited to, 8Asperger's Syndrome and autism, as defined in the most recent 9edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental 10Disorders of the American Psychiatric Association.11    (l-1) The General Assembly recognizes that the best 12interests of the child require that the child be placed in the 13most permanent living arrangement as soon as is practically 14possible. To achieve this goal, the General Assembly directs 15the Department of Children and Family Services to conduct 16concurrent planning so that permanency may occur at the 17earliest opportunity. Permanent living arrangements may 18include prevention of placement of a child outside the home of 19the family when the child can be cared for at home without 20endangering the child's health or safety; reunification with 21the family, when safe and appropriate, if temporary placement 22is necessary; or movement of the child toward the most 23permanent living arrangement and permanent legal status.24    When determining reasonable efforts to be made with 25respect to a child, as described in this subsection, and in 26making such reasonable efforts, the child's health and safety   HB1721- 15 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1shall be the paramount concern.2    When a child is placed in foster care, the Department 3shall ensure and document that reasonable efforts were made to 4prevent or eliminate the need to remove the child from the 5child's home. The Department must make reasonable efforts to 6reunify the family when temporary placement of the child 7occurs unless otherwise required, pursuant to the Juvenile 8Court Act of 1987. At any time after the dispositional hearing 9where the Department believes that further reunification 10services would be ineffective, it may request a finding from 11the court that reasonable efforts are no longer appropriate. 12The Department is not required to provide further 13reunification services after such a finding.14    A decision to place a child in substitute care shall be 15made with considerations of the child's health, safety, and 16best interests. At the time of placement, consideration should 17also be given so that if reunification fails or is delayed, the 18placement made is the best available placement to provide 19permanency for the child.20    The Department shall adopt rules addressing concurrent 21planning for reunification and permanency. The Department 22shall consider the following factors when determining 23appropriateness of concurrent planning:24        (1) the likelihood of prompt reunification;25        (2) the past history of the family;26        (3) the barriers to reunification being addressed by   HB1721- 16 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1    the family;2        (4) the level of cooperation of the family;3        (5) the foster parents' willingness to work with the 4    family to reunite;5        (6) the willingness and ability of the foster family 6    to provide an adoptive home or long-term placement;7        (7) the age of the child;8        (8) placement of siblings.9    (m) The Department may assume temporary custody of any 10child if:11        (1) it has received a written consent to such 12    temporary custody signed by the parents of the child or by 13    the parent having custody of the child if the parents are 14    not living together or by the guardian or custodian of the 15    child if the child is not in the custody of either parent, 16    or17        (2) the child is found in the State and neither a 18    parent, guardian nor custodian of the child can be 19    located.20If the child is found in the child's residence without a 21parent, guardian, custodian, or responsible caretaker, the 22Department may, instead of removing the child and assuming 23temporary custody, place an authorized representative of the 24Department in that residence until such time as a parent, 25guardian, or custodian enters the home and expresses a 26willingness and apparent ability to ensure the child's health   HB1721- 17 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1and safety and resume permanent charge of the child, or until a 2relative enters the home and is willing and able to ensure the 3child's health and safety and assume charge of the child until 4a parent, guardian, or custodian enters the home and expresses 5such willingness and ability to ensure the child's safety and 6resume permanent charge. After a caretaker has remained in the 7home for a period not to exceed 12 hours, the Department must 8follow those procedures outlined in Section 2-9, 3-11, 4-8, or 95-415 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.10    The Department shall have the authority, responsibilities 11and duties that a legal custodian of the child would have 12pursuant to subsection (9) of Section 1-3 of the Juvenile 13Court Act of 1987. Whenever a child is taken into temporary 14custody pursuant to an investigation under the Abused and 15Neglected Child Reporting Act, or pursuant to a referral and 16acceptance under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 of a minor in 17limited custody, the Department, during the period of 18temporary custody and before the child is brought before a 19judicial officer as required by Section 2-9, 3-11, 4-8, or 205-415 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, shall have the 21authority, responsibilities and duties that a legal custodian 22of the child would have under subsection (9) of Section 1-3 of 23the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.24    The Department shall ensure that any child taken into 25custody is scheduled for an appointment for a medical 26examination.  HB1721- 18 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1    A parent, guardian, or custodian of a child in the 2temporary custody of the Department who would have custody of 3the child if the child were not in the temporary custody of the 4Department may deliver to the Department a signed request that 5the Department surrender the temporary custody of the child. 6The Department may retain temporary custody of the child for 710 days after the receipt of the request, during which period 8the Department may cause to be filed a petition pursuant to the 9Juvenile Court Act of 1987. If a petition is so filed, the 10Department shall retain temporary custody of the child until 11the court orders otherwise. If a petition is not filed within 12the 10-day period, the child shall be surrendered to the 13custody of the requesting parent, guardian, or custodian not 14later than the expiration of the 10-day period, at which time 15the authority and duties of the Department with respect to the 16temporary custody of the child shall terminate.17    (m-1) The Department may place children under 18 years of 18age in a secure child care facility licensed by the Department 19that cares for children who are in need of secure living 20arrangements for their health, safety, and well-being after a 21determination is made by the facility director and the 22Director or the Director's designate prior to admission to the 23facility subject to Section 2-27.1 of the Juvenile Court Act 24of 1987. This subsection (m-1) does not apply to a child who is 25subject to placement in a correctional facility operated 26pursuant to Section 3-15-2 of the Unified Code of Corrections,   HB1721- 19 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1unless the child is a youth in care who was placed in the care 2of the Department before being subject to placement in a 3correctional facility and a court of competent jurisdiction 4has ordered placement of the child in a secure care facility.5    (n) The Department may place children under 18 years of 6age in licensed child care facilities when in the opinion of 7the Department, appropriate services aimed at family 8preservation have been unsuccessful and cannot ensure the 9child's health and safety or are unavailable and such 10placement would be for their best interest. Payment for board, 11clothing, care, training and supervision of any child placed 12in a licensed child care facility may be made by the 13Department, by the parents or guardians of the estates of 14those children, or by both the Department and the parents or 15guardians, except that no payments shall be made by the 16Department for any child placed in a licensed child care 17facility for board, clothing, care, training, and supervision 18of such a child that exceed the average per capita cost of 19maintaining and of caring for a child in institutions for 20dependent or neglected children operated by the Department. 21However, such restriction on payments does not apply in cases 22where children require specialized care and treatment for 23problems of severe emotional disturbance, physical disability, 24social adjustment, or any combination thereof and suitable 25facilities for the placement of such children are not 26available at payment rates within the limitations set forth in   HB1721- 20 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1this Section. All reimbursements for services delivered shall 2be absolutely inalienable by assignment, sale, attachment, or 3garnishment or otherwise.4    (n-1) The Department shall provide or authorize child 5welfare services, aimed at assisting minors to achieve 6sustainable self-sufficiency as independent adults, for any 7minor eligible for the reinstatement of wardship pursuant to 8subsection (2) of Section 2-33 of the Juvenile Court Act of 91987, whether or not such reinstatement is sought or allowed, 10provided that the minor consents to such services and has not 11yet attained the age of 21. The Department shall have 12responsibility for the development and delivery of services 13under this Section. An eligible youth may access services 14under this Section through the Department of Children and 15Family Services or by referral from the Department of Human 16Services. Youth participating in services under this Section 17shall cooperate with the assigned case manager in developing 18an agreement identifying the services to be provided and how 19the youth will increase skills to achieve self-sufficiency. A 20homeless shelter is not considered appropriate housing for any 21youth receiving child welfare services under this Section. The 22Department shall continue child welfare services under this 23Section to any eligible minor until the minor becomes 21 years 24of age, no longer consents to participate, or achieves 25self-sufficiency as identified in the minor's service plan. 26The Department of Children and Family Services shall create   HB1721- 21 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1clear, readable notice of the rights of former foster youth to 2child welfare services under this Section and how such 3services may be obtained. The Department of Children and 4Family Services and the Department of Human Services shall 5disseminate this information statewide. The Department shall 6adopt regulations describing services intended to assist 7minors in achieving sustainable self-sufficiency as 8independent adults. 9    (o) The Department shall establish an administrative 10review and appeal process for children and families who 11request or receive child welfare services from the Department. 12Youth in care who are placed by private child welfare 13agencies, and foster families with whom those youth are 14placed, shall be afforded the same procedural and appeal 15rights as children and families in the case of placement by the 16Department, including the right to an initial review of a 17private agency decision by that agency. The Department shall 18ensure that any private child welfare agency, which accepts 19youth in care for placement, affords those rights to children 20and foster families. The Department shall accept for 21administrative review and an appeal hearing a complaint made 22by (i) a child or foster family concerning a decision 23following an initial review by a private child welfare agency 24or (ii) a prospective adoptive parent who alleges a violation 25of subsection (j-5) of this Section. An appeal of a decision 26concerning a change in the placement of a child shall be   HB1721- 22 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1conducted in an expedited manner. A court determination that a 2current foster home placement is necessary and appropriate 3under Section 2-28 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 does not 4constitute a judicial determination on the merits of an 5administrative appeal, filed by a former foster parent, 6involving a change of placement decision.7    (p) (Blank).8    (q) The Department may receive and use, in their entirety, 9for the benefit of children any gift, donation, or bequest of 10money or other property which is received on behalf of such 11children, or any financial benefits to which such children are 12or may become entitled while under the jurisdiction or care of 13the Department, except that the benefits described in Section 145.46 must be used and conserved consistent with the provisions 15under Section 5.46.16    The Department shall set up and administer no-cost, 17interest-bearing accounts in appropriate financial 18institutions for children for whom the Department is legally 19responsible and who have been determined eligible for 20Veterans' Benefits, Social Security benefits, assistance 21allotments from the armed forces, court ordered payments, 22parental voluntary payments, Supplemental Security Income, 23Railroad Retirement payments, Black Lung benefits, or other 24miscellaneous payments. Interest earned by each account shall 25be credited to the account, unless disbursed in accordance 26with this subsection.  HB1721- 23 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1    In disbursing funds from children's accounts, the 2Department shall:3        (1) Establish standards in accordance with State and 4    federal laws for disbursing money from children's 5    accounts. In all circumstances, the Department's 6    Guardianship Administrator or the Guardianship 7    Administrator's designee must approve disbursements from 8    children's accounts. The Department shall be responsible 9    for keeping complete records of all disbursements for each 10    account for any purpose.11        (2) Calculate on a monthly basis the amounts paid from 12    State funds for the child's board and care, medical care 13    not covered under Medicaid, and social services; and 14    utilize funds from the child's account, as covered by 15    regulation, to reimburse those costs. Monthly, 16    disbursements from all children's accounts, up to 1/12 of 17    $13,000,000, shall be deposited by the Department into the 18    General Revenue Fund and the balance over 1/12 of 19    $13,000,000 into the DCFS Children's Services Fund.20        (3) Maintain any balance remaining after reimbursing 21    for the child's costs of care, as specified in item (2). 22    The balance shall accumulate in accordance with relevant 23    State and federal laws and shall be disbursed to the child 24    or the child's guardian or to the issuing agency.25    (r) The Department shall promulgate regulations 26encouraging all adoption agencies to voluntarily forward to   HB1721- 24 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1the Department or its agent names and addresses of all persons 2who have applied for and have been approved for adoption of a 3hard-to-place child or child with a disability and the names 4of such children who have not been placed for adoption. A list 5of such names and addresses shall be maintained by the 6Department or its agent, and coded lists which maintain the 7confidentiality of the person seeking to adopt the child and 8of the child shall be made available, without charge, to every 9adoption agency in the State to assist the agencies in placing 10such children for adoption. The Department may delegate to an 11agent its duty to maintain and make available such lists. The 12Department shall ensure that such agent maintains the 13confidentiality of the person seeking to adopt the child and 14of the child.15    (s) The Department of Children and Family Services may 16establish and implement a program to reimburse Department and 17private child welfare agency foster parents licensed by the 18Department of Children and Family Services for damages 19sustained by the foster parents as a result of the malicious or 20negligent acts of foster children, as well as providing third 21party coverage for such foster parents with regard to actions 22of foster children to other individuals. Such coverage will be 23secondary to the foster parent liability insurance policy, if 24applicable. The program shall be funded through appropriations 25from the General Revenue Fund, specifically designated for 26such purposes.  HB1721- 25 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1    (t) The Department shall perform home studies and 2investigations and shall exercise supervision over visitation 3as ordered by a court pursuant to the Illinois Marriage and 4Dissolution of Marriage Act or the Adoption Act only if:5        (1) an order entered by an Illinois court specifically 6    directs the Department to perform such services; and7        (2) the court has ordered one or both of the parties to 8    the proceeding to reimburse the Department for its 9    reasonable costs for providing such services in accordance 10    with Department rules, or has determined that neither 11    party is financially able to pay.12    The Department shall provide written notification to the 13court of the specific arrangements for supervised visitation 14and projected monthly costs within 60 days of the court order. 15The Department shall send to the court information related to 16the costs incurred except in cases where the court has 17determined the parties are financially unable to pay. The 18court may order additional periodic reports as appropriate.19    (u) In addition to other information that must be 20provided, whenever the Department places a child with a 21prospective adoptive parent or parents, in a licensed foster 22home, group home, or child care institution, or in a relative 23home, the Department shall provide to the prospective adoptive 24parent or parents or other caretaker:25        (1) available detailed information concerning the 26    child's educational and health history, copies of   HB1721- 26 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1    immunization records (including insurance and medical card 2    information), a history of the child's previous 3    placements, if any, and reasons for placement changes 4    excluding any information that identifies or reveals the 5    location of any previous caretaker;6        (2) a copy of the child's portion of the client 7    service plan, including any visitation arrangement, and 8    all amendments or revisions to it as related to the child; 9    and10        (3) information containing details of the child's 11    individualized educational plan when the child is 12    receiving special education services.13    The caretaker shall be informed of any known social or 14behavioral information (including, but not limited to, 15criminal background, fire setting, perpetuation of sexual 16abuse, destructive behavior, and substance abuse) necessary to 17care for and safeguard the children to be placed or currently 18in the home. The Department may prepare a written summary of 19the information required by this paragraph, which may be 20provided to the foster or prospective adoptive parent in 21advance of a placement. The foster or prospective adoptive 22parent may review the supporting documents in the child's file 23in the presence of casework staff. In the case of an emergency 24placement, casework staff shall at least provide known 25information verbally, if necessary, and must subsequently 26provide the information in writing as required by this   HB1721- 27 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1subsection. 2    The information described in this subsection shall be 3provided in writing. In the case of emergency placements when 4time does not allow prior review, preparation, and collection 5of written information, the Department shall provide such 6information as it becomes available. Within 10 business days 7after placement, the Department shall obtain from the 8prospective adoptive parent or parents or other caretaker a 9signed verification of receipt of the information provided. 10Within 10 business days after placement, the Department shall 11provide to the child's guardian ad litem a copy of the 12information provided to the prospective adoptive parent or 13parents or other caretaker. The information provided to the 14prospective adoptive parent or parents or other caretaker 15shall be reviewed and approved regarding accuracy at the 16supervisory level. 17    (u-5) Effective July 1, 1995, only foster care placements 18licensed as foster family homes pursuant to the Child Care Act 19of 1969 shall be eligible to receive foster care payments from 20the Department. Relative caregivers who, as of July 1, 1995, 21were approved pursuant to approved relative placement rules 22previously promulgated by the Department at 89 Ill. Adm. Code 23335 and had submitted an application for licensure as a foster 24family home may continue to receive foster care payments only 25until the Department determines that they may be licensed as a 26foster family home or that their application for licensure is   HB1721- 28 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1denied or until September 30, 1995, whichever occurs first.2    (u-6) Beginning on and after January 1, 2026, a foster 3family home that includes a pregnant or parenting youth in 4care and any child of the parenting youth shall be eligible to 5receive additional foster care payments from the Department to 6cover all reasonable costs incurred by the foster family in 7caring for the pregnant or parenting youth and any child of the 8parenting youth. A parenting youth must be the full-time 9custodial parent of the child for whom the foster family is 10requesting additional payment under this subsection. The 11Department may prescribe by rule which costs and expenses 12qualify as "reasonable costs" eligible for payment under this 13subsection. The Department may adopt any other rules necessary 14to implement the provisions of this subsection. 15    (v) The Department shall access criminal history record 16information as defined in the Illinois Uniform Conviction 17Information Act and information maintained in the adjudicatory 18and dispositional record system as defined in Section 2605-355 19of the Illinois State Police Law if the Department determines 20the information is necessary to perform its duties under the 21Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act, the Child Care Act 22of 1969, and the Children and Family Services Act. The 23Department shall provide for interactive computerized 24communication and processing equipment that permits direct 25on-line communication with the Illinois State Police's central 26criminal history data repository. The Department shall comply   HB1721- 29 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1with all certification requirements and provide certified 2operators who have been trained by personnel from the Illinois 3State Police. In addition, one Office of the Inspector General 4investigator shall have training in the use of the criminal 5history information access system and have access to the 6terminal. The Department of Children and Family Services and 7its employees shall abide by rules and regulations established 8by the Illinois State Police relating to the access and 9dissemination of this information.10    (v-1) Prior to final approval for placement of a child, 11the Department shall conduct a criminal records background 12check of the prospective foster or adoptive parent, including 13fingerprint-based checks of national crime information 14databases. Final approval for placement shall not be granted 15if the record check reveals a felony conviction for child 16abuse or neglect, for spousal abuse, for a crime against 17children, or for a crime involving violence, including rape, 18sexual assault, or homicide, but not including other physical 19assault or battery, or if there is a felony conviction for 20physical assault, battery, or a drug-related offense committed 21within the past 5 years.22    (v-2) Prior to final approval for placement of a child, 23the Department shall check its child abuse and neglect 24registry for information concerning prospective foster and 25adoptive parents, and any adult living in the home. If any 26prospective foster or adoptive parent or other adult living in   HB1721- 30 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1the home has resided in another state in the preceding 5 years, 2the Department shall request a check of that other state's 3child abuse and neglect registry. 4    (w) Within 120 days of August 20, 1995 (the effective date 5of Public Act 89-392), the Department shall prepare and submit 6to the Governor and the General Assembly, a written plan for 7the development of in-state licensed secure child care 8facilities that care for children who are in need of secure 9living arrangements for their health, safety, and well-being. 10For purposes of this subsection, secure care facility shall 11mean a facility that is designed and operated to ensure that 12all entrances and exits from the facility, a building or a 13distinct part of the building, are under the exclusive control 14of the staff of the facility, whether or not the child has the 15freedom of movement within the perimeter of the facility, 16building, or distinct part of the building. The plan shall 17include descriptions of the types of facilities that are 18needed in Illinois; the cost of developing these secure care 19facilities; the estimated number of placements; the potential 20cost savings resulting from the movement of children currently 21out-of-state who are projected to be returned to Illinois; the 22necessary geographic distribution of these facilities in 23Illinois; and a proposed timetable for development of such 24facilities.25    (x) The Department shall conduct annual credit history 26checks to determine the financial history of children placed   HB1721- 31 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1under its guardianship pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act of 21987. The Department shall conduct such credit checks starting 3when a youth in care turns 12 years old and each year 4thereafter for the duration of the guardianship as terminated 5pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. The Department 6shall determine if financial exploitation of the child's 7personal information has occurred. If financial exploitation 8appears to have taken place or is presently ongoing, the 9Department shall notify the proper law enforcement agency, the 10proper State's Attorney, or the Attorney General.11    (y) Beginning on July 22, 2010 (the effective date of 12Public Act 96-1189), a child with a disability who receives 13residential and educational services from the Department shall 14be eligible to receive transition services in accordance with 15Article 14 of the School Code from the age of 14.5 through age 1621, inclusive, notwithstanding the child's residential 17services arrangement. For purposes of this subsection, "child 18with a disability" means a child with a disability as defined 19by the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education 20Improvement Act of 2004. 21    (z) The Department shall access criminal history record 22information as defined as "background information" in this 23subsection and criminal history record information as defined 24in the Illinois Uniform Conviction Information Act for each 25Department employee or Department applicant. Each Department 26employee or Department applicant shall submit the employee's   HB1721- 32 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1or applicant's fingerprints to the Illinois State Police in 2the form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police. 3These fingerprints shall be checked against the fingerprint 4records now and hereafter filed in the Illinois State Police 5and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history 6records databases. The Illinois State Police shall charge a 7fee for conducting the criminal history record check, which 8shall be deposited into the State Police Services Fund and 9shall not exceed the actual cost of the record check. The 10Illinois State Police shall furnish, pursuant to positive 11identification, all Illinois conviction information to the 12Department of Children and Family Services. 13    For purposes of this subsection: 14    "Background information" means all of the following: 15        (i) Upon the request of the Department of Children and 16    Family Services, conviction information obtained from the 17    Illinois State Police as a result of a fingerprint-based 18    criminal history records check of the Illinois criminal 19    history records database and the Federal Bureau of 20    Investigation criminal history records database concerning 21    a Department employee or Department applicant. 22        (ii) Information obtained by the Department of 23    Children and Family Services after performing a check of 24    the Illinois State Police's Sex Offender Database, as 25    authorized by Section 120 of the Sex Offender Community 26    Notification Law, concerning a Department employee or   HB1721- 33 -LRB104 03120 KTG 13141 b1    Department applicant. 2        (iii) Information obtained by the Department of 3    Children and Family Services after performing a check of 4    the Child Abuse and Neglect Tracking System (CANTS) 5    operated and maintained by the Department. 6    "Department employee" means a full-time or temporary 7employee coded or certified within the State of Illinois 8Personnel System. 9    "Department applicant" means an individual who has 10conditional Department full-time or part-time work, a 11contractor, an individual used to replace or supplement staff, 12an academic intern, a volunteer in Department offices or on 13Department contracts, a work-study student, an individual or 14entity licensed by the Department, or an unlicensed service 15provider who works as a condition of a contract or an agreement 16and whose work may bring the unlicensed service provider into 17contact with Department clients or client records. 18(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 19102-1014, eff. 5-27-22; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-50, eff. 201-1-24; 103-546, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 221, 2026.